Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 4. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 43.90.400.
Alaska Gasline Inducement Act reimbursement fund; disbursements; audits.

There is established in the general fund an Alaska Gasline Inducement Act reimbursement fund. The fund consists of money appropriated to it by the legislature for disbursement to pay the state’s reimbursements under AS

43.90.110

. Money appropriated to the fund may be spent for the purposes of the fund without further appropriation. Appropriations to the fund do not lapse under AS

37.25.010

, but remain in the fund for future disbursements. Nothing in this subsection creates a dedicated fund.

The Department of Revenue shall manage the fund, and may invest money in the fund so as to yield competitive market rates as provided in AS

37.10.071

. Income earned on the fund shall be accounted for separately and may be appropriated annually to the fund.

The commissioners shall adopt regulations that provide for application to receive reimbursements for qualified expenditures as provided under AS

43.90.110

, and that provide for periodic audits of the use of money disbursed as reimbursements under this chapter.

Within 10 days after the convening of each regular session of the legislature, the commissioners shall submit to the legislature a report that lists all the disbursements from the fund during the preceding fiscal year with a written justification for each disbursement and the projected amount of money that will be required for reimbursements in each of the next three fiscal years.

History.

(§ 1 ch 22 SLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska gasline inducement act reimbursement, see 15 AAC 90, art. 1.

Sec. 43.90.410.
Regulations.

The commissioners may jointly adopt or amend regulations for the purpose of implementing the provisions of this chapter. The commissioner of revenue and the commissioner of natural resources may adopt or amend regulations adopted under authority outside of this chapter as necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 22 SLA 2007)

Sec. 43.90.420.
Statute of limitations.

A person may not bring a judicial action challenging the constitutionality of this chapter or the constitutionality of a license issued under this chapter unless the action is commenced in a court of the state of competent jurisdiction within 90 days after the date that a license is issued.

History.

(§ 1 ch 22 SLA 2007)

Sec. 43.90.430.
Interest.

When a payment due to the state under this chapter becomes delinquent, the payment bears interest at the rate applicable to a delinquent tax under AS

43.05.225

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 22 SLA 2007)

Sec. 43.90.440.
Licensed project assurances.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the state grants a licensee assurances that the licensee has exclusive enjoyment of the inducements provided under this chapter before the commencement of commercial operations. If, before the commencement of commercial operations, the state extends to another person preferential royalty or tax treatment or grant of state money for the purpose of facilitating the construction of a competing natural gas pipeline project in this state, and if the licensee is in compliance with the requirements of the license and with the requirements of state and federal statutes and regulations relevant to the project, the licensee is entitled to payment from the state of an amount equal to three times the total amount of the expenditures incurred and paid by the licensee that are qualified expenditures for the purposes of AS

43.90.110

that the licensee incurred in developing the licensee’s project before the date that the state first extended preferential treatment to another person. The payment under this subsection is subject to appropriation. Upon payment by the state of the amount owed under this section, the licensee shall, at no additional cost to the state, assign to the state or the state’s designee all engineering designs, contracts, permits, and other data related to the project that were acquired by the licensee during the term of the license. The payment under this subsection is in full satisfaction of all claims the licensee may bring in contract, tort, or other law related to the events that gave rise to the payment.

The review, processing, or facilitation of a permit, right-of-way, or authorization by a state agency in connection with a competing natural gas pipeline project does not create an obligation on the part of the state under this section.

In this section,

“competing natural gas pipeline project” means a project designed to accommodate throughput of more than 500,000,000 cubic feet a day of North Slope gas to market;

“preferential royalty or tax treatment” does not include

the state’s exercise of its right to resolve disputes involving royalties and taxes; or

the state’s exercise of its right to modify royalties as authorized by law in effect on June 8, 2007.

History.

(§ 1 ch 22 SLA 2007)

Sec. 43.90.450.
Assignments.

A licensee may transfer all or part of the license, including the rights and obligations arising under the license, if, after publishing notice of the proposed transfer, providing notice to the presiding officer of each house of the legislature, and providing a period of not less than 30 days for public review and comment,

the transfer is approved in writing in advance by the commissioners; and

the transfer does not increase or diminish the obligations created by the license or diminish the likelihood of success of the project or the net present value of the license to the state.

Notwithstanding the commissioners’ approval of a transfer of all or part of a license under (a) of this section, the transferor of the license remains subject to the requirements of AS

43.90.220

regarding all state money received by the licensee before the effective date of the transfer.

A person may transfer that person’s rights to the royalty inducement under AS

43.90.310

and the gas production tax exemption under AS

43.90.320

only in connection with a sale or merger that results in transfer of all the person’s assets in the North Slope along with the person’s firm transportation capacity contracts in the project.

Except for the transfer of a voucher to a producer under AS

43.90.330

(b), a person receiving a voucher under AS

43.90.330

based on the person’s acquisition of firm transportation capacity in the first binding open season of the project may transfer the voucher only if the transfer is in connection with the permanent assignment by the person of 100 percent of the firm transportation capacity acquired in the first binding open season of the project.

History.

(§ 1 ch 22 SLA 2007)

Sec. 43.90.460.
Conflicting laws.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to repeal or abrogate the administrative, regulatory, or statutory procedures and functions of state and federal law governing the development and oversight of a project.

History.

(§ 1 ch 22 SLA 2007)

Sec. 43.90.470.
State pipeline employment development.

The commissioner of labor and workforce development shall develop a job training program that will provide training for Alaskans in gas pipeline project management, construction, operations, maintenance, and other gas pipeline-related positions.

History.

(§ 1 ch 22 SLA 2007)